th: เส้นผ่านศูนย์กลางของลูกบอลหัวต่อ: 1 7/8 นิ้ว; 2 5/16 นิ้ว; 2 นิ้ว; 50 มม.; อื่นๆ
nb: Diameter på tilhengerfestekule: 1 7/8 tommer; 2 5/16 tommer; 2 tommer; 50 mm; Annet
vi: Đường kính đầu bi móc kéo: 1 7/8 in; 2 5/16 in; 2 in; 50 mm; Khác
ro-RO: Diametrul bilei de remorcare: 1 7/8 in; 2 5/16 in; 2 in; 50 mm; Altele
tr: Çeki topuzu çapı: 1 7/8 inç; 2 5/16 inç; 2 inç; 50 mm; Diğer
pt-BR: Diâmetro da esfera de engate: 1 7/8 pol.; 2 5/16 pol.; 2 pol.; 50 mm; Outros
sk-SK: Priemer gule ťažného zariadenia: 1 7/8 in; 2 5/16 in; 2 in; 50 mm; Iné
ru: Диаметр шара фаркопа: 1 7/8 дюйма; 2 5/16 дюйма; 2 дюйма; 50 мм; Другое
hu: Vonóhorog gömbfejének átmérője: 1 7/8 in; 2 5/16 in; 2 in; 50 mm; Egyéb
sv: Dragkrokens diameter: 1 7/8 tum; 2 5/16 tum; 2 tum; 50 mm; Annat
sl-SI: Premer vlečne krogle: 1 7/8 palca; 2 5/16 palca; 2 palca; 50 mm; Drugo
pt-PT: diâmetro da bola de engate: 1 7/8 pol.; 2 5/16 pol.; 2 pol.; 50 mm; Outro
fr: Diamètre de la boule d’attelage: 1 7/8 po; 2 5/16 po; 2 po; 50 mm; Autre
es: Diámetro de la bola de enganche: 1 7/8 pulgadas; 2 5/16 pulgadas; 2 pulgadas; 50 mm; Otro
zh-CN: 拖车球直径: 1 7/8 in; 2 5/16 in; 2 in; 50 mm; 其他
ja: ヒッチボールの直径: 1 7/8 in; 2 5/16 in; 2 in; 50 mm; その他
nl: Trekhaakkogel diameter: 1 7/8 in; 2 5/16 in; 2 in; 50 mm; Overig
lt-LT: Priekabos kablio rutulio skersmuo: 1 7/8 col.; 2 5/16 col.; 2 col.; 50 mm; Kita
el: Διάμετρος σφαίρας κοτσαδόρου: 1 7/8 in; 2 5/16 in; 2 in; 50 mm; Άλλο
cs: Průměr koule tažného zařízení: 1 7/8 in; 2 5/16 in; 2 in; 50 mm; Jiný
pl: Średnica kuli haka: 1 7/8 cala; 2 5/16 cala; 2 cale; 50 mm; Inna
da: Kuglediameter på anhængertræk: 1 7/8 tommer; 2 5/16 tommer; 2 tommer; 50 mm; Andet
de: Kugeldurchmesser der Anhängerkupplung: 1 7/8 Zoll; 2 5/16 Zoll; 2 Zoll; 50 mm; Andere
zh-TW: 拖車球直徑: 1 7/8 in; 2 5/16 in; 2 in; 50 mm; 其他
bg-BG: Диаметър на тегличната топка: 1 7/8 инча; 2 5/16 инча; 2 инча; 50 мм; Други
fi: Vetokuulan halkaisija: 1 7/8 in; 2 5/16 in; 2 in; 50 mm; Muu
hr-HR: Promjer kugle za vuču: 1 7/8 in; 2 5/16 in; 2 in; 50 mm; Ostalo
en: Hitch ball diameter: 1 7/8 in; 2 5/16 in; 2 in; 50 mm; Other
it: Diametro della sfera di traino: 1 7/8 pollici; 2 5/16 pollici; 2 pollici; 50 mm; Altro
ko: 히치볼 직경: 1 7/8 in; 2 5/16 in; 2 in; 50 mm; 기타